Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-202 Purpose. (a) The purpose
of this part is to protect, subject to certain limitations, the persons
specified in section 431:16-203 against failure in the performance of
contractual obligations, under life and accident and health or sickness insurance
policies and annuity contracts specified in section 431:16-203(b), because of
the impairment or insolvency of the member insurer that issued the policies or
contracts.

(b) To provide this protection, an association
of insurers is created to pay benefits and to continue coverages as limited
herein, and members of the association are subject to assessment to provide
funds to carry out the purpose of this part. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L
2002, c 155, §91]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next